Utah, session 2026, SB209.
Section 1. Section 79-4-609 is enacted to read:79-4-609. Gooseberry Narrows State Park -- Study -- Report.(1)As used in this section, "gooseberry narrows" means the land on Gooseberry Creek between the Lower Gooseberry Dam and Fairview Lakes described by the map and legal description on file with the division.(2)The division shall study the feasibility of creating Gooseberry Narrows State Park, including:(a)any necessary requirement for the development or construction of a dam and reservoir in the gooseberry narrows; and(b)the expected cost to the state of:(i)transferring, exchanging, or purchasing all federally managed lands in the gooseberry narrows;(ii)constructing and developing infrastructure needed for a state park in the gooseberry narrows; and(iii)constructing and developing a dam and reservoir in the gooseberry narrows.(3)Before November 30, 2026, the division shall report the results of the study described in Subsection (2) to the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.